tr: Oyun Adı: Bira pong; Sarhoş jenga; Bardak çevirmece; Krallar Kupası; Daha önce hiç; Güç saati; Çeyrekler; Ateş çemberi; Doğruluk mu cesaret mi; Diğer
ko: 게임 이름: 비어퐁; 술게임 젠가; 플립 컵; 킹스 컵; 해본 적 없어; 파워 아워; 쿼터; 불의 고리; 진실 또는 음료; 기타
en: Game name: Beer pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Never have I ever; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Other
de: Spielname: Bierpong; Drunk Jenga; Flip Cup; Kings Cup; Ich habe noch nie; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring Of Fire; Truth or Drink; Sonstiges
el: Όνομα παιχνιδιού: Πονγκ μπύρας; Μεθυσμένο Τζένγκα; Αναποδογυρισμένα ποτηράκια; Κύπελλο του βασιλιά; Ποτέ μου δεν έχω; Ώρα για σφηνάκια; Quarters; Δαχτυλίδι της φωτιάς; Αλήθεια ή ποτό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Ime igre: Pivski pong; Pijana jenga; Skodelica za prevračanje; Kraljeva kupica; Nikoli nisem nikoli; Ura moči; Četrtine; Ognjeni obroč; Resnica ali pijača; Drugo
da: Spilnavn: Ølpong; Druk-jenga; Flip-kop; King-kop; Jeg har aldrig; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Sandhed eller drik; Andet
pl: Nazwa gry: Beer pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Prawda czy wyzwanie; Godzina mocy; Kwartały; Pierścień ognia; Prawda lub napój; Pozostałe
ja: ゲーム名: ビアポン; ドランクジェンガ; フリップカップ; キングスカップ; Never have I ever; パワーアワー; クォーターズ; 炎のリング; トゥルース・オア・ドリンク; その他
pt-BR: Nome do jogo: Beer Pong; Drunk Jenga; Flip Cup; Kings Cup; Eu nunca; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Verdade ou bebida; Outro
hr-HR: Naziv igre: Pivski pong; Pijana jenga; Okreni čašu; King’s cup; Nikad nisam; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Istina ili piće; Ostalo
zh-TW: 遊戲名稱: 投杯球; 成人飲酒疊疊樂; 翻轉杯; 國王杯; 我從來沒有; 電力時間; 宿舍; 火圈; 真心話喝一杯; 其他
ru: Название игры: Пивной понг; Пьяная дженга; Переворачивающаяся чашка; Кубок королей; Я никогда не; Час силы; Четвертаки; Кольцо огня; Правда или выпивка; Другой
zh-CN: 游戏名称: 投杯球; 酒吧叠叠乐; 转杯; 国王之杯; 我从来没有; 电源小时; 宿舍; 火圈; 真相或喝酒; 其他
it: Nome del gioco: Beer pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Non ho mai; Power hour; Gioco della monetina; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Altro
fr: Nom du jeu: Beer Pong; Jeu à boire Jenga; Flip Cup; King’s Cup; Never have I ever; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring of Fire; Truth or Drink; Autre
nb: Spillnavn: Beer Pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Jeg har aldri; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Annen
sk-SK: Názov hry: Pivný pong; Opitá jenga; Preklop pohár; Kráľov pohár; Nikdy som; Hodina pitia; Hod mincou; Ohnivý kruh; Pravda alebo pohárik; Iné
hu: Játék neve: Sörpong; Részeg jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Never have I ever; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Egyéb
es: Nombre del juego: Beer Pong; Drunk Jenga; Flip Cup; Kings Cup; Yo nunca…; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Otros
sv: Spelnamn: Ölpingis; Öl-jenga; Flip Cup; Kung; Jag har aldrig; Power Hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Sanning eller konsekvens; Annat
pt-PT: Nome do jogo: Beer Pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Eu nunca; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Outro
fi: Pelin nimi: Beer Pong; Drunk jenga; Kääntökuppi; Kings cup; En ole koskaan; Tehotunti; Quarters; Ring of fire; Totuus tai juoma; Muu
vi: Tên trò chơi: Ném bóng uống bia; Rút gỗ uống rượu; Lật cốc; Cốc của nhà vua; Tôi chưa từng; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Thật hay uống; Khác
nl: Spelnaam: Bierpong; Dronken toren; Flip cup; Kingsen; Ik heb nog nooit; Power Hour; Quarters; Kingsen; Truth or Drink; Andere
lt-LT: Žaidimo pavadinimas: Alaus tenisas; Girta dženga; Puodelių apvertimas; Karaliaus taurė; Tiesa drąsa; Galios valanda; Ketvirčiai; Ugnies žiedas; Tiesa ar gėrimas; Kita
th: ชื่อเกม: เบียร์ปอง; ดรังก์เจงก้า; พลิกถ้วย; ไพ่พระราชา; ฉันไม่เคย; ชั่วโมงแห่งพลัง; โยนเหรียญ; วงแหวนแห่งไฟ; ความจริงหรือดื่ม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Nume joc: Beer pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Never have I ever; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Altele
cs: Název hry: Pivní ping pong; Opilá jenga; Otoč pohárek; Králův pohár; Nikdy jsem...; Uhádni píseň; Čtvrťáky; Ohnivý kruh; Řekni pravdu nebo se napij; Jiné
bg-BG: Име на играта: Beer pong; Drunk jenga; Flip cup; Kings cup; Never have I ever; Power hour; Quarters; Ring of fire; Truth or drink; Други